Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2281.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4502(a)(3) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 4502. Qualifications of jurors.(a) General rule.--Every citizen of this Commonwealth who is of the required minimum age for voting for State or local officials and who resides in the county shall be qualified to serve as a juror therein unless such citizen:* * *(3) [has been convicted of] is serving a sentence , INCLUDING A TERM OF PROBATION OR PAROLE, for a crime punishable by imprisonment for more than one year [and has not been granted a pardon or amnesty therefor].<--1234567891011121314151617 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2281PN3638 - 2 - 12